Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.025

Offices and personnel.

The office shall maintain appropriate offices and employ and fix compensation of such personnel as may be necessary to perform the advanced college tuition payment program and the Washington college savings program duties. The office shall consult with the governing body on the selection, compensation, and other issues relating to the employment of the program director. The positions are exempt from classified service under chapter 41.06 RCW. The employees shall be employees of the office.

[ 2016 c 69 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 169; 2000 c 14 s 2; 1998 c 69 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—1998 c 69: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 20, 1998]." [ 1998 c 69 s 6.]